Missouri, session 2026, HB2464.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 197, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto seven new sections, to
be known as sections 197.1060, 197.1063, 197.1066, 197.1069, 197.1072, 197.1075, and
197.1078, to read as follows:
197.1060. Sections 197.1060 to 197.1078 shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Terminally Ill Patient Dignity and Care Act".
197.1063. As used in sections 197.1060 to 197.1078, the following terms mean:
(1) "Hospital", any institution licensed under this chapter that provides
inpatient care;
(2) "Neglect":
(a) Failure of a hospital or its staff to provide timely, appropriate, and adequate
care necessary to relieve pain or other distressing symptoms;
(b) Failure to respond within a medically appropriate period to a patient's or
family's call for assistance or relief of suffering; or
(c) Abandonment of a patient without reasonable oversight while the patient is
in pain or distress;
(3) "Terminally ill patient", a patient who has a condition that reasonably can be
expected to result in death within six months as certified in writing by a licensed
physician.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2464 2
197.1066. 1. Each hospital shall adopt and enforce care protocols specific to
terminally ill patients that ensure that:
(1) Pain and symptom management are initiated and evaluated at intervals
consistent with best practice standards for palliative care;
(2) A response to a patient's request for assistance, including via call light, nurse
referral, or a family advocate, occurs within a reasonable time frame not to exceed
thirty minutes unless clinically justified;
(3) No patient is left unattended without adequate supervision or monitoring
while experiencing pain or distress; and
(4) Each patient or his or her designated representative is informed of the care
protocols required under this subsection, is offered the opportunity to designate a family
member or advocate to monitor and raise concerns about care, and has access to clear
instructions on how to file a complaint of neglect.
2. Hospitals shall maintain documentation for each terminally ill patient of:
(1) The physician's certification of terminal illness;
(2) The interventions for pain and symptom relief provided and the time
intervals at which the relief is provided;
(3) The time between a patient's or family's request for assistance, or call-light
activation, and staff response; and
(4) Any complaints of neglect or delay in care and the investigation and
resolution of any such complaints.
197.1069. 1. Each hospital shall designate a terminal care ombudsman
responsible for:
(1) Receiving and reviewing all complaints from terminally ill patients or their
families concerning neglect or delay in care;
(2) Tracking response times and compliance with the care protocols required in
section 197.1066; and
(3) Reporting annually to the department of health and senior services on the
hospital's compliance statistics for terminally ill patient care.
2. A hospital may designate an employee in an existing job position as the
terminal care ombudsman.
3. The terminal care ombudsman shall have access to care records and response-
time logs and shall have authority to recommend internal corrective actions.
197.1072. 1. The department of health and senior services shall promulgate
rules to implement sections 197.1060 to 197.1078. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the

HB 2464 3
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after the effective date of this section shall be invalid
and void.
2. The department of health and senior services may investigate verified
complaints of neglect alleging violations of the requirements of sections 197.1060 to
197.1078. Upon finding a substantial violation by a hospital, the department of health
and senior services may impose administrative sanctions including, but not limited to:
(1) Corrective orders requiring compliance by the hospital within a defined time
frame;
(2) Civil penalties of up to five thousand dollars for each violation; and
(3) Suspension or revocation of the hospital's license.
3. The department of health and senior services shall make publicly available on
its website the annual reports filed by each hospital under section 197.1069, along with
the aggregate data on response times and complaints, in a manner that protects patient
confidentiality.
197.1075. 1. A hospital shall not retaliate against an employee of the hospital
who, in good faith, reports neglect or a delay of care affecting a terminally ill patient in
violation of the requirements of sections 197.1060 to 197.1078.
2. A hospital that violates this section is liable to the employee for all of the
following:
(1) Reinstatement to the employee's position without loss of seniority;
(2) Two times the amount of lost back pay; and
(3) Interest on the back pay at the rate of one percent over the prime rate.
197.1078. 1. A terminally ill patient or his or her designated representative shall
have the right to:
(1) Be informed in a timely manner of the patient's rights under sections
191.1060 to 191.1078;
(2) Make a complaint to the hospital's terminal care ombudsman and to the
department of health and senior services without fear of reprisal; and
(3) Have a designated family member or advocate present or available to
intervene on behalf of the patient's comfort and care.
2. A hospital shall post in each inpatient unit a notice of rights under sections
191.1060 to 191.1078 that includes contact information for the terminal care

HB 2464 4
ombudsman and a description of complaint procedures of the department of health and
senior services.
Section B. The enactment of sections 197.1060, 197.1063, 197.1066, 197.1069,
197.1072, 197.1075, and 197.1078 of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
✔